Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Chapter 7. Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act.

§ 55.1-700.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Electronic delivery,”
for purposes of delivery of the disclosures required by this chapter, means sending the required disclosures via the Internet, provided that the sender retains sufficient proof of the electronic delivery, which may be an electronic receipt of delivery, a confirmation that the notice was sent by facsimile, or a certificate of service prepared by the sender confirming the electronic delivery.

“Notification”
means a statement acknowledging that the purchaser has been advised of any disclosures required by this chapter on the Real Estate Board’s website or delivery of any such disclosures to the purchaser.

“Ratification”
means the full execution of a real estate purchase contract by all parties.

“Real estate contract”
means a contract for the sale, exchange, or lease with the option to buy of residential real estate subject to this chapter.

History.

2017, c. 386, § 55-517.1; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 749.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 749 substituted “acknowledging that the purchaser has been advised” for “of the availability” in the definition for “Notification.”

§ 55.1-701.
Applicability.

The provisions of this chapter apply only with respect to transfers by sale, exchange, installment land sales contract, or lease with option to buy of residential real property consisting of not less than one nor more than four dwelling units, whether or not the transaction is with the assistance of a licensed real estate broker or salesperson.

History.

1992, c. 717, § 55-517; 2007, c. 265; 2017, c. 386; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-702.
Exemptions.

The following are specifically excluded from the provisions of this chapter:

Transfers pursuant to court order including transfers ordered by a court in administration of an estate, transfers pursuant to a writ of execution, transfers by foreclosure sale or by a deed in lieu of a foreclosure, transfers by a trustee in bankruptcy, transfers by eminent domain, and transfers resulting from a judgment for specific performance. Also, transfers by an assignment for the benefit of creditors pursuant to Chapter 18.1 (§

8.01-525.1

et seq.) of Title 8.01 and transfers pursuant to escheats pursuant to Chapter 24 (§

55.1-2400

et seq.).

Transfers to a beneficiary of a deed of trust pursuant to a foreclosure sale or by a deed in lieu of foreclosure, or transfers by a beneficiary under a deed of trust who has acquired the real property at a sale conducted pursuant to a foreclosure sale under a deed of trust or has acquired the real property by a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

Transfers by a fiduciary in the course of the administration of a decedent’s estate, guardianship, conservatorship, or trust.

Transfers from one or more co-owners solely to one or more other co-owners.

Transfers made solely to any combination of a spouse or one or more persons in the lineal line of consanguinity of one or more of the transferors.

Transfers between spouses resulting from a decree of divorce or a property settlement stipulation pursuant to the provisions of Title 20.

Transfers made by virtue of the record owner’s failure to pay any federal, state, or local taxes.

Transfers to or from any governmental entity or public or quasi-public housing authority or agency.

Transfers involving the first sale of a dwelling, provided that this exemption shall not apply to the disclosures required by §

55.1-704

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision A 9, the builder of a new dwelling shall disclose in writing to the purchaser all known material defects that would constitute a violation of any applicable building code. In addition, for property that is located wholly or partially in any locality comprising Planning District 15, the builder or owner, if the builder is not the owner of the property, shall disclose in writing whether the builder or owner has any knowledge of (i) whether mining operations have previously been conducted on the property or (ii) the presence of abandoned mines, shafts, or pits, if any. The disclosures required by this subsection shall be made by a builder or owner (a) when selling a completed dwelling, before ratification of the real estate purchase contract or (b) when selling a dwelling before or during its construction, after issuance of a certificate of occupancy. Such disclosure shall not abrogate any warranty or any other contractual obligations the builder or owner may have to the purchaser. The disclosure required by this subsection may be made on the disclosure form described in §

55.1-703

. If no defects are known by the builder to exist, no written disclosure is required by this subsection.

History.

1992, c. 717, § 55-518; 1993, c. 824; 1994, cc. 80, 242; 2005, c. 510; 2006, c. 706; 2007, c. 265; 2017, c. 386; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-703.
Required disclosures for buyer to beware; buyer to exercise necessary due diligence.

The owner of the residential real property shall furnish to a purchaser a residential property disclosure statement for the buyer to beware of certain matters that may affect the buyer’s decision to purchase such real property. Such statement shall be provided by the Real Estate Board on its website.

The residential property disclosure statement provided by the Real Estate Board on its website shall include the following:

The owner makes no representations or warranties as to the condition of the real property or any improvements thereon, or with regard to any covenants and restrictions, or any conveyances of mineral rights, as may be recorded among the land records affecting the real property or any improvements thereon, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence a particular purchaser deems necessary, including obtaining a home inspection, as defined in §

54.1-500

, a mold assessment conducted by a business that follows the guidelines provided by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, and a residential building energy analysis, as defined in §

54.1-1144

, in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract;

The owner makes no representation with respect to current lot lines or the ability to expand, improve, or add any structures on the property, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence a particular purchaser deems necessary, including obtaining a property survey and contacting the locality to determine zoning ordinances or lot coverage, height, or setback requirements on the property.

The owner makes no representations with respect to any matters that may pertain to parcels adjacent to the subject parcel, including zoning classification or permitted uses of adjacent parcels, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence a particular purchaser deems necessary with respect to adjacent parcels in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract;

The owner makes no representations to any matters that pertain to whether the provisions of any historic district ordinance affect the property, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence a particular purchaser deems necessary with respect to any historic district designated by the locality pursuant to §

15.2-2306

, including review of (i) any local ordinance creating such district, (ii) any official map adopted by the locality depicting historic districts, and (iii) any materials available from the locality that explain (a) any requirements to alter, reconstruct, renovate, restore, or demolish buildings or signs in the local historic district and (b) the necessity of any local review board or governing body approvals prior to doing any work on a property located in a local historic district, in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract;

The owner makes no representations with respect to whether the property contains any resource protection areas established in an ordinance implementing the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) adopted by the locality where the property is located pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:74

, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence a particular purchaser deems necessary to determine whether the provisions of any such ordinance affect the property, including review of any official map adopted by the locality depicting resource protection areas, in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract;

The owner makes no representations with respect to information on any sexual offenders registered under Chapter 23 (§

19.2-387

et seq.) of Title 19.2, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence they deem necessary with respect to such information, in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract;

The owner makes no representations with respect to whether the property is within a dam break inundation zone. Such disclosure statement shall advise purchasers to exercise whatever due diligence they deem necessary with respect to whether the property resides within a dam break inundation zone, including a review of any map adopted by the locality depicting dam break inundation zones;

The owner makes no representations with respect to the presence of any wastewater system, including the type or size of the wastewater system or associated maintenance responsibilities related to the wastewater system, located on the property, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence they deem necessary to determine the presence of any wastewater system on the property and the costs associated with maintaining, repairing, or inspecting any wastewater system, including any costs or requirements related to the pump-out of septic tanks, in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract;

The owner makes no representations with respect to any right to install or use solar energy collection devices on the property;

The owner makes no representations with respect to whether the property is located in one or more special flood hazard areas, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence they deem necessary, including (i) obtaining a flood certification or mortgage lender determination of whether the property is located in one or more special flood hazard areas, (ii) reviewing any map depicting special flood hazard areas, (iii) contacting the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) or visiting the website for FEMA’s National Flood Insurance Program or the Virginia Flood Risk Information website operated by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, and (iv) determining whether flood insurance is required, in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract. A flood risk information form, pursuant to the provisions of subsection D, that provides additional information on flood risk and flood insurance is available for download by the Real Estate Board on its website;

The owner makes no representations with respect to whether the property is subject to one or more conservation or other easements, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence a particular purchaser deems necessary in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract;

The owner makes no representations with respect to whether the property is subject to a community development authority approved by a local governing body pursuant to Article 6 (§

15.2-5152

et seq.) of Chapter 51 of Title 15.2, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence a particular purchaser deems necessary in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, including determining whether a copy of the resolution or ordinance has been recorded in the land records of the circuit court for the locality in which the community development authority district is located for each tax parcel included in the district pursuant to §

15.2-5157

, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract;

The owner makes no representations with respect to whether the property is located on or near deposits of marine clays (marumsco soils), and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence a particular purchaser deems necessary in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, including consulting public resources regarding local soil conditions and having the soil and structural conditions of the property analyzed by a qualified professional;

The owner makes no representations with respect to whether the property is located in a locality classified as Zone 1 or Zone 2 by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s (EPA) Map of Radon Zones, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence they deem necessary to determine whether the property is located in such a zone, including (i) reviewing the EPA’s Map of Radon Zones or visiting the EPA’s radon information website; (ii) visiting the Virginia Department of Health’s Indoor Radon Program website; (iii) visiting the National Radon Proficiency Program’s website; (iv) visiting the National Radon Safety Board’s website that lists the Board’s certified contractors; and (v) ordering a radon inspection, in accordance with the terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract;

The owner makes no representations with respect to whether the property contains any pipe, pipe or plumbing fitting, fixture, solder, or flux that does not meet the federal Safe Drinking Water Act definition of “lead free” pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 300g-6, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence they deem necessary to determine whether the property contains any pipe, pipe or plumbing fitting, fixture, solder, or flux that does not meet the federal Safe Drinking Water Act definition of “lead free,” in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract;

The owner makes no representations with respect to the existence of defective drywall on the property, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence they deem necessary to determine whether there is defective drywall on the property, in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract. For purposes of this subdivision, “defective drywall” means the same as that term is defined in §

36-156.1

; and

The owner makes no representation with respect to the condition or regulatory status of any impounding structure or dam on the property or under the ownership of the common interest community that the owner of the property is required to join, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence a particular purchaser deems necessary to determine the condition, regulatory status, cost of required maintenance and operation, or other relevant information pertaining to the impounding structure or dam, including contacting the Department of Conservation and Recreation or a licensed professional engineer.

The residential property disclosure statement shall be delivered in accordance with §

55.1-709

.

The Real Estate Board shall make available on its website a flood risk information form. Such form shall be substantially as follows:

Flood Risk Information Form

The purpose of this information form is to provide property owners and potential property owners with information regarding flood risk. This information form does not determine whether a property owner will be required to purchase a flood insurance policy. That determination is made by the lender providing a loan for the property at the lender’s discretion.

Mortgage lenders are mandated under the Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973 and the National Flood Insurance Reform Act of 1994 to require the purchase of flood insurance by property owners who acquire loans from federally regulated, supervised, or insured financial institutions for the acquisition or improvement of land, facilities, or structures located within or to be located within a Special Flood Hazard Area. A Special Flood Hazard Area (SFHA) is a high-risk area defined as any land that would be inundated by a flood, also known as a base flood, having a one percent chance of occurring in a given year. The lender reviews the current National Flood Insurance Program (NFIP) maps for the community in which the property is located to determine its location relative to the published SFHA and completes the Standard Flood Hazard Determination Form (SFHDF), created by the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA). If the lender determines that the structure is indeed located within a SFHA and the community is participating in the NFIP, the borrower is then notified that flood insurance will be required as a condition of receiving the loan. A similar review and notification are completed whenever a loan is sold on the secondary loan market or when the lender completes a routine review of its mortgage portfolio.

Properties that are not located in a SFHA can still flood. Flood damage is not generally covered by a standard home insurance policy. It is prudent to consider purchasing flood insurance even when flood insurance is not required by a lender. Properties not located in a SFHA may be eligible for a low-cost preferred risk flood insurance policy. Property owners and buyers are encouraged to consult with their insurance agent about flood insurance.

What is a flood? A flood is a general and temporary condition of partial or complete inundation of two or more acres of normally dry land area or of two or more properties, at least one of which is the policyholder’s property, from (i) overflow of inland or tidal waters, (ii) unusual and rapid accumulation or runoff of surface waters from any source, (iii) mudflow, or (iv) collapse or subsidence of land along the shore of a lake or similar body of water as a result of erosion or undermining caused by waves or currents of water exceeding anticipated cyclical levels that result in a flood.

FEMA is required to update Flood Maps every five years. Flood zones for this property may change due to periodic map updates. To determine what flood zone or zones a property is located in a buyer can visit the website for FEMA’s National Flood Insurance Program or the Virginia Department of Conservation and Recreation’s Flood Risk Information System website.

History.

1992, c. 717, § 55-519; 1996, c. 379; 1998, cc. 384, 795; 2005, c. 510; 2006, cc. 247, 514, 533, 705, 767; 2007, cc. 265, 784; 2008, c. 491; 2009, c. 641; 2010, c. 518; 2011, c. 461; 2013, c. 357; 2015, cc. 79, 269; 2016, cc. 161, 323, 436, 505; 2017, cc. 386, 569; 2018, cc. 60, 86; 2019, cc. 390, 504, 712; 2020, cc. 23, 24, 26, 186, 200, 313, 520, 655, 656; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 10, 322, 323; 2022, c. 268.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2019, c. 390 amended
§ 55-519 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in subdivision B 7 by inserting “the existence or recordation of” and “such as contacting their settlement provider, consulting the locality in which the property is located, or reviewing any survey of the property that may have been conducted.”

Acts
2019, c. 504 amended
§ 55-519, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in subdivision B 1, by inserting “or any conveyances of mineral rights”; and in subdivision B 10, by inserting “(iii) contacting the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) or visiting the website for FEMA’s National Flood Insurance Program or for the Virginia Department of Conservation and Recreation’s Flood Risk Information System, and” and redesignating former clause (ii) as clause (iv).

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 322 and
323, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 23 added subdivision B 13, which was renumbered as subdivision B 12 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendment by c. 24 added subdivision B 13.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 26 and 186 are identical, and inserted “and a residential building energy analysis, as defined in §

54.1-1144

” in subdivision B 1.

The 2020 amendment by c. 200 added subdivisions B 13 and B 14, which were renumbered as subdivisions B 14 and B 15 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendment by c. 313 deleted former subdivision B 7, which read: “The owner makes no representations with respect to the presence of any stormwater detention facilities located on the property, or the existence or recordation of any maintenance agreement for such facilities, and purchasers are advised to exercise whatever due diligence they deem necessary to determine the presence of any stormwater detention facilities on the property, or any maintenance agreement for such facilities, such as contacting their settlement provider, consulting the locality in which the property is located, or reviewing any survey of the property that may have been conducted, in accordance with terms and conditions as may be contained in the real estate purchase contract, but in any event prior to settlement pursuant to such contract” (now see §

55.1-708.1

); and renumbered former subdivisions B 8 through B 12 as subdivisions B 7 through B 11.

The 2020 amendment by c. 520 added subdivision B 13, which is identical to the subdivision B 13 added by Acts 2020, c. 200 and was renumbered as subdivision B 14 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 655 and 656 are identical, and added subdivision B 13, which was renumbered as subdivision B 16 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 10, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “a mold assessment conducted by a business that follows the guidelines provided by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency” in subdivision B 1.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 322 and 323, effective January 1, 2022, are identical, and in subdivision A 9, substituted “the Virginia Flood Risk Information website operated by the Department of Conservation and Recreation” for “for the Virginia Department of Conservation and Recreation’s Flood Risk Information System” in clause (iii), and added the last sentence; and added subsection D.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 268, redesignated former subdivision B 2 as current subdivision B 3 and redesignated accordingly; and added subdivision B 2.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The cases cited below were decided under prior law.

Defects not limited to those listed in the Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act. —

Actionable “defects” under the Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act (VRPDA) are not limited to those defects that were set out in § 55-519, because the listed defects relate to known defects to be disclosed, and they do not relate to disclaimer statements; § 55-519 states that the disclosure form may include the listed defects but does not indicate the exclusivity of the list, and because the VRPDA does not otherwise define “defects,” the list of potential “defects” in § 55-519 does not constrain the use of the term “defects.” McGlen v. Rosenfeld, 82 Va. Cir. 108, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 3 (Fairfax County Jan. 13, 2011).

Failure to provide disclaimer. —

Attorneys’ demurrer to a purchaser’s action alleging that the failure to file suit against sellers within the one-year limitations period of subsection C of § 55-524 was a breach of an implied obligation to perform legal services, was sustained because there was no negligence on the part of the attorneys for failing to timely file the complaint in the underlying suit; the purpose of residential disclosure or disclaimer requirements in the Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act, §§ 55-519 and 55-519.1, is to provide protection to purchasers of residential property against issues as to the property being sold that are not readily apparent but may exist, and a failure to provide a “disclaimer,” which puts the purchaser on notice of one of the specified potential issues, does not serve the contemplated purpose of the Act, and it is therefore not a “disclaimer” for purposes of starting the one-year statute. McGlen v. Rosenfeld, 82 Va. Cir. 108, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 3 (Fairfax County Jan. 13, 2011).

Use of both disclaimer and disclosure statement simultaneously not allowed. —

Where a relocation company and an original seller enticed the buyers into purchasing certain real property with a disclosure, the company and the owner could not simultaneously use the contractual term “as is”; as a result, the owner’s and the company’s motion for demurrer had to be denied. Zirkle v. Cendant Mobility Servs. Corp., 61 Va. Cir. 3, 2003 Va. Cir. LEXIS 26 (Roanoke Jan. 7, 2003).

Consumer fraud claims. —

When buyers sued sellers for fraud in a real estate sale, it was not error to apply the Virginia Consumer Protection Act, § 59.1-196 et seq., to double damages because (1) the evidence showed a seller was a “supplier, (2) fraud vitiated the contract, and (3) the Virginia Real Estate Property Disclosure Act, § 55-519, did not preempt the fraud claim. Buki v. Devine, 88 Va. Cir. 1, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 143 (Northumberland County Mar. 8, 2013), modified, 88 Va. Cir. 1, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 144 (Northumberland County Aug. 23, 2013).

§ 55.1-704.
Required disclosures pertaining to a military air installation.

The owner of residential real property located in any locality in which a military air installation is located shall disclose to the purchaser whether the subject parcel is located in a noise zone or accident potential zone, or both, if so designated on the official zoning map by the locality in which the property is located. Such disclosure shall be provided to the purchaser on a form provided by the Real Estate Board on its website. Such disclosure shall state the specific noise zone or accident potential zone, or both, in which the property is located according to the official zoning map.

History.

2005, c. 510, § 55-519.1; 2007, c. 265; 2017, c. 386; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The case cited below was decided under prior law.

Failure to provide disclaimer. —

Attorneys’ demurrer to a purchaser’s action alleging that the failure to file suit against sellers within the one-year limitations period of subsection C of § 55-524 was a breach of an implied obligation to perform legal services, was sustained because there was no negligence on the part of the attorneys for failing to timely file the complaint in the underlying suit; the purpose of residential disclosure or disclaimer requirements in the Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act, §§ 55-519 and 55-519.1, is to provide protection to purchasers of residential property against issues as to the property being sold that are not readily apparent but may exist, and a failure to provide a “disclaimer,” which puts the purchaser on notice of one of the specified potential issues, does not serve the contemplated purpose of the Act, and it is therefore not a “disclaimer” for purposes of starting the one-year statute. McGlen v. Rosenfeld, 82 Va. Cir. 108, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 3 (Fairfax County Jan. 13, 2011).

§ 55.1-705.
Repealed by Acts 2020, c. 200, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

55.1-705

, which required disclosure of defective drywall, derived from Acts 2011, cc. 34, 46, § 55-519.2; 2017, c. 386; 2019, c. 712.

§ 55.1-706.
Required disclosures; pending building or zoning violations.

Notwithstanding the exemptions in §

55.1-702

, if the owner of a residential dwelling unit has actual knowledge of any pending enforcement actions pursuant to the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.) that affect the safe, decent, sanitary living conditions of the property of which the owner has been notified in writing by the locality, or any pending violation of the local zoning ordinance that the violator has not abated or remedied under the zoning ordinance, within a time period set out in the written notice of violation from the locality or established by a court of competent jurisdiction, the owner shall provide to a prospective purchaser a written disclosure that so states. Such disclosure shall be provided to the purchaser on a form provided by the Real Estate Board on its website and otherwise in accordance with this chapter.

History.

2017, c. 386, § 55-519.2:1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-706.1.
Required disclosures; lis pendens.

Notwithstanding the exemptions in §

55.1-702

, if the owner of a residential dwelling unit has actual knowledge of a lis pendens filed against such dwelling unit pursuant to §

8.01-268

, such owner shall provide to a prospective purchaser a written disclosure that so states. Such disclosure shall be provided to the purchaser on a form provided by the Real Estate Board on its website and otherwise in accordance with this chapter.

History.

2022, c. 610.

§ 55.1-707.
Permissive disclosure; tourism activity zone.

An owner of residential property located partially or wholly within a designated tourism activity zone established pursuant to §

15.2-982

may disclose in writing to any prospective purchaser or lessee of the property that the subject property is located within a tourism activity zone, with a description of potential impacts associated with the parcel’s location in a tourism activity zone, including impacts caused by special events, parades, temporary street closures, and indoor and outdoor entertainment activities.

History.

2013, c. 246, § 55-519.3; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-708.
Required disclosures; property previously used to manufacture methamphetamine.

Notwithstanding the exemptions in §

55.1-702

, if the owner of a residential dwelling unit has actual knowledge that such residential property was previously used to manufacture methamphetamine and has not been cleaned up in accordance with the guidelines established pursuant to §

32.1-11.7

and the applicable licensing provisions of Chapter 11 (§

54.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 54.1, the owner shall provide to a prospective purchaser a written disclosure that so states. Such disclosure shall be provided to the purchaser on a form provided by the Real Estate Board on its website and otherwise in accordance with this chapter.

History.

2013, c. 557, § 55-519.4; 2016, c. 527; 2017, c. 386; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 557, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2014, except that the provisions of this act in §

32.1-11.7

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-708.1.
Required disclosures; stormwater management facilities.

An owner of residential real property who has actual knowledge of a privately owned stormwater management facility located on such property shall disclose to the purchaser the long-term maintenance and inspection requirements for the facility. Such disclosure shall be provided to the purchaser in accordance with this chapter and on a form provided by the Real Estate Board on its website.

History.

2020, c. 313.

§ 55.1-708.2.
Required disclosures pertaining to repetitive loss.

The owner of residential real property located in the Commonwealth who has actual knowledge that the dwelling unit is a repetitive risk loss structure shall disclose such fact to the purchaser. For purposes of this section, “repetitive risk loss” means that two or more claims of more than $1,000 were paid by the National Flood Insurance Program within any rolling 10-year period, since 1978. Such disclosure shall be provided to the purchaser on a form provided by the Real Estate Board on its website.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 322, 323.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 322 and
323, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

§ 55.1-709.
Time for disclosure; termination of contract.

The owner of residential real property subject to this chapter shall provide notification to the purchaser of any disclosures required by this chapter prior to the ratification of a real estate purchase contract or otherwise be subject to the provisions of subsection B. The disclosures required by this chapter shall be provided by the Real Estate Board on its website. The disclosures shall be current as of the date of delivery. Nothing herein shall be construed to require the seller to provide subsequent delivery of additional disclosures if a transaction pursuant to a ratified real estate contract proceeds to settlement after the effective date of legislation amending any of the disclosures under this chapter, provided that the correct disclosures were delivered under the law in effect at the time of delivery.

If the disclosures required by this chapter are delivered to the purchaser after ratification of the real estate purchase contract, the purchaser’s sole remedy shall be to terminate the real estate purchase contract upon or prior to the earliest of (i) three days after delivery of the disclosure statement in person or by electronic delivery; (ii) five days after the postmark if the disclosure statement is deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, and properly addressed to the purchaser; (iii) settlement upon purchase of the property; (iv) occupancy of the property by the purchaser; (v) the purchaser’s making written application to a lender for a mortgage loan where such application contains a disclosure that the right of termination shall end upon the application for the mortgage loan; or (vi) the execution by the purchaser after receiving the disclosure statement required by this chapter of a written waiver of the purchaser’s right of termination under this chapter contained in a writing separate from the real estate purchase contract. In order to terminate a real estate purchase contract when permitted by this chapter, the purchaser must, within the times required by this chapter, give written notice to the owner by one of the following methods:

Hand delivery;

United States mail, postage prepaid, provided that the sender retains sufficient proof of mailing, which may be a certificate of service prepared by the sender confirming such mailing;

Electronic delivery; or

Overnight delivery using a commercial service or the United States Postal Service.If the purchaser terminates a real estate purchase contract in compliance with this chapter, the termination shall be without penalty to the purchaser, and any deposit shall be promptly returned to the purchaser.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B of §

55.1-713

, no purchaser of residential real property located in a noise zone designated on the official zoning map of the locality as having a day-night average sound level of less than 65 decibels shall have the right to terminate a real estate purchase contract pursuant to this section for failure of the property owner to timely provide any disclosure required by this chapter.

History.

1992, c. 717, § 55-520; 1993, c. 818; 2005, c. 510; 2007, c. 265; 2011, c. 82; 2017, c. 386; 2018, cc. 60, 86; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 749.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 749 added the third and fourth sentences in subsection A.

§ 55.1-710.
Owner liability.

Except with respect to the disclosures required by §

55.1-704

, the owner shall not be liable for any error, inaccuracy, or omission of any information delivered pursuant to this chapter if (i) the error, inaccuracy, or omission was not within the actual knowledge of the owner or was based on information provided by public agencies or by other persons providing information that is required to be disclosed pursuant to this chapter, or the owner reasonably believed the information to be correct, and (ii) the owner was not grossly negligent in obtaining the information from a third party and transmitting it. The owner shall not be liable for any error, inaccuracy, or omission of any information required to be disclosed by §

55.1-704

if the error, inaccuracy, or omission was the result of information provided by an officer or employee of the locality in which the property is located.

The delivery by a public agency or other person, as described in subsection C, of any information required to be disclosed by this chapter to a prospective purchaser shall be deemed to comply with the requirements of this chapter and shall relieve the owner of any further duty under this chapter with respect to that item of information.

The delivery by the owner of a report or opinion prepared by a licensed engineer, land surveyor, geologist, wood-destroying insect control expert, contractor, or home inspection expert, dealing with matters within the scope of the professional’s license or expertise, shall satisfy the requirements of this chapter if the information is provided to the prospective purchaser pursuant to a request for such information, whether written or oral. In responding to such a request, an expert may indicate, in writing, an understanding that the information provided will be used in fulfilling the requirements of this chapter and, if so, shall indicate the required disclosures, or portions of such required disclosures, to which the information being furnished is applicable. Where such a statement is furnished, the expert shall not be responsible for any items of information, or portions of items of information, other than those expressly set forth in the statement.

History.

1992, c. 717, § 55-521; 2005, c. 510; 2007, c. 265; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.